Tennessee, session 114, SB1879.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (a)(4)(H)(ii), (a)(31)(F), (a)(32)(B), (f)(9), and (u)(5).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1879
010051
- 1 -